Hawaii statutes.
[§431:19-211] Annual reporting; books and
records. (a) For purposes of section 431:19-107(a), the commissioner may
require any appropriate or necessary modification or supplemental or additional
information to be filed with the required financial statements.

(b) Unless otherwise approved in advance by
the commissioner, a special purpose financial captive insurance company shall
maintain its books, records, documents, accounts, vouchers, and agreements in
this State. A special purpose financial captive insurance company shall make
its books, records, documents, accounts, vouchers, and agreements available for
inspection by the commissioner at any time. A special purpose financial
captive insurance company shall keep its books and records in a manner that its
financial condition, affairs, and operations can be readily ascertained and so
that the commissioner may readily verify its financial statements and determine
its compliance with this part.

(c) Unless otherwise approved in advance by
the commissioner, all original books, records, documents, accounts, vouchers,
and agreements shall be preserved and kept available in this State for the
purpose of examination and inspection and until a time as the commissioner
approves the destruction or other disposition of the books, records, documents,
accounts, vouchers, and agreements. If the commissioner approves the keeping
of the items listed in this subsection outside this State, then the special
purpose financial captive insurance company shall maintain in this State a
complete and true copy of each original. Books, records, documents, accounts,
vouchers, and agreements may be photographed, reproduced on film, or stored and
reproduced electronically. [L 2008, c 190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next